Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,107
Water supply from outside the state; power of district to acquire; contracts; bonds.

When any district organized under sections 46-101 to 46-128 shall find it necessary to procure and acquire the supply of water necessary for any or all ditches outside of the boundaries of this state, and from some adjoining state, then in such event it shall be lawful for such district to contract or bargain with any person, company or corporation legally existing within such state, outside of the boundaries of this state, for the required supply of such necessary water for the district within the state. The voting, issuance and sale of bonds in such district within the state for the payment of such rights and franchises of such persons, companies or corporations of such foreign state, for the use and benefit of such district within this state, shall be deemed valid and of full force and effect and have the same operation as though the same rights and franchises existed wholly within this state.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 64, p. 304;

R.S.1913, § 3520;

C.S.1922, § 2920;

C.S.1929, § 46-165;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,107.